Maryland, session 2025, SB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–740.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MOTORIZED VESSEL” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VESSEL
POWERED BY AN ELECTRIC MOTOR.
(B) (A) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE A GASOLINE–POWERED MOTORIZED
GASOLINE–POWERED VESSEL MANUFACTURED AFTER JULY 31, 2007, THAT HAS A
CABIN OR OTHER CLOSED LIVING SPACE ACCOMMODATION SPACES, SWIM
PLATFORMS, OR AFT LOUNGING AREAS ON THE WATERS OF THE STATE UNLESS THE
VESSEL HAS CARBON MONOXIDE WARNING LABELS AFFIXED IN CONSPICUOUS
LOCATIONS IN THE VICINITY OF BOTH THE TRANSOM AND THE HELM OF THE VESSEL.
(C) THE (B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT IMPOSE A PENALTY ON A
PERSON THAT VIOLATES THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.